Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1116.01
Budget allowance; expend; restriction.

No department, commission, board or agency of state government may spend any money beyond its budget allowance without specific authority from the Legislature.

Laws 1967, c. 367, § 3, p. 959.